Washington statutes.
RCW 36.96.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context requires otherwise:

(1) "Special purpose district" means every municipal and quasi-municipal corporation other than counties, cities, and towns. Such special purpose districts shall include, but are not limited to, water-sewer districts, fire protection districts, port districts, public utility districts, county park and recreation service areas, flood control zone districts, diking districts, drainage improvement districts, and solid waste collection districts, but shall not include industrial development districts created by port districts, and shall not include local improvement districts, utility local improvement districts, and road improvement districts;

(2) "Governing authority" means the commission, council, or other body which directs the affairs of a special purpose district;

(3) "Inactive" means that a special purpose district is characterized by any of the following criteria:

(a) Has not carried out any of the special purposes or functions for which it was formed within the preceding consecutive five-year period;

(b) No election has been held for the purpose of electing a member of the governing body within the preceding consecutive seven-year period or, in those instances where members of the governing body are appointed and not elected, where no member of the governing body has been appointed within the preceding seven-year period; or

(c) The special purpose district has been determined to be unauditable by the state auditor;

(4) "Unauditable" means a special purpose district that the state auditor has determined to be incapable of being audited because the special purpose district has improperly maintained, failed to maintain, or failed to submit adequate accounts, records, files, or reports for an audit to be completed.

[ 2020 c 179 s 2; 1999 c 153 s 50; 1979 ex.s. c 5 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—1999 c 153: See note following RCW 57.04.050.